foma_files/n-allomorphs.foma
# deprecatory
define dep=allm [ ["^DEP" -> {isi} || ~i _ ]
                | ["^DEP" -> {osi} || i _ ]
				];

# interessive
define int=allm [ "^INT" -> {n} || _ .#. ];

# locale-ablative
define loc=abl=allm [ "^LA" -> {kea}  || Vowels _, s h _ ];

# ergative marker
define erg=allm [ [ "^ERG" -> {an} || s _, s h _, x _ ]
				| [ "^ERG" -> {en} || s _, s h _, x _ ]
				| [ "^ERG" -> {in} || s _, s h _, x _ ]
				| [ "^ERG" -> {man} || n _ ]
				| [ "^ERG" -> {n} || [a|e|i|o|u] _ ]
				];
